South Dakota, session 2026, HB1234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-26-18 be AMENDED:
1-26-18. Opportunity shall be afforded to all parties to respond and present
evidence on issues of fact and argument on issues of law or policy. Each agency, upon the
motion of any party, may dispose of any defense or claim:
(1) If the pleadings, depositions, answers to interrogatories, and admissions on file,
together with the affidavits, if any, show that there is no genuine issue as to any
material fact and a party is entitled to a judgment as a matter of law; or
(2) At the close of the evidence offered by the proponent of the defense or claim, if
the agency determines that the evidence offered by the proponent of the defense
or claim is legally insufficient to sustain the defense or claim.
A party to a contested case proceeding may appear in person or by counsel, or
both, and may be present during the giving of all evidence. The party or the party's
attorney of record may have reasonable opportunity to inspect all documentary evidence,
examine and cross-examine witnesses, present evidence in support of the party's interest,
and issue subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses and production of evidence on
the party's behalf.
Section 2. That § 1-26-19.1 be AMENDED:
1-26-19.1. Each agency and any attorney of record or officer of the agency
charged with the duty to administer the laws of the state and the rules of the agency may:
(1) Administer oaths as provided by chapter 18-3; and

26.822.14 2 1234
(2) Subpoena witnesses or interested parties to appear and give testimony and to
produce records, books, papers, and documents relating to any matter in a
contested case, as provided in § 15-6-45.
Unless otherwise provided by law, fees for witnesses are as set forth in chapter 19-
5 and must be paid by the agency or party for whom the witness is subpoenaed.
Failure of a person to obey a subpoena issued pursuant to this chapter may be
punished as a contempt of court in the manner provided by chapter 21-34.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-26:
Before a subpoena commanding the production of documentary evidence pursuant
to § 1-26-19.1 is served on the person to whom it is directed, a notice and copy of the
subpoena must be served on each party to the matter pending. The hearing examiner or
administrative law judge, upon motion made promptly and at or before the time specified
in the subpoena for compliance with the subpoena, may:
(1) Quash or modify the subpoena if it is unreasonable and oppressive; or
(2) Condition denial of the motion upon the advancement, by the person on whose
behalf the subpoena is issued, of the reasonable cost of producing the records,
books, papers, or documents.
HB1234 ENROLLED

26.822.14 3 1234
An Act to revise provisions related to serving a subpoena in a contested case.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1234
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1234 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1234 ENROLLED